Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 415, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 415. Grants awarded under the Heritage Preservation

Grant Program shall not may be used for capital improvements or, for

repairs. Grants may be used only, or for operating expenses for

eligible entities engaged in collecting, preserving, and sharing

Oklahoma heritage. Preference will shall be given to projects

affecting collections, educational programs, and exhibits. Grants

may be used to support the development of strategic plans.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.



60-2-2689 BRC 12/17/2025 2:32:22 PM



Req. No. 2689 Page 1